Maine, session 132, LD135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §7030-E, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 191, §1, is amended to read:
§7030-E. Meetings; compensation
The commission shall meet at the call of the chair not less than 4 times each year.
Mileage and toll reimbursement for commission members are authorized for up to 2
meetings per year.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§88-A, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 191, §2, is
amended to read:
88-A.
Women Permanent Commission on the Not Authorized 5 MRSA §7029
Status of Women Mileage and toll
reimbursement for up
to 2 meetings per
year
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides allocations to provide mileage and toll reimbursement for up to 2
meetings per year for members of the Permanent Commission on the Status of Women.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,290 $3,290
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,290 $3,290
Page 1 - 132LR0091(03)